Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1731
Insurance requirements.

Nothing in the State Park System Construction Alternatives Act shall limit or reduce statutory or regulatory requirements regarding insurance.

Laws 2018, LB775, § 32.